Illinois, session 104th, SB2690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 8commercial solar energy facilities. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Brisbin Road commercial or industrial site" means 11property in Grundy County that is located within 2.5 miles of 12the Brisbin Road Exit on Interstate 80 and that has been 13designated for commercial or industrial use in a planning 14document adopted before January 1, 2025 by Grundy County or a 15municipality with planning jurisdiction. 16    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 17solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 18Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 19mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 20at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 21event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 22subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 23Act.   SB2690- 2 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 2conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 3total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 4facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 5an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 6municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 7Public Act 102-1123).8    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 9ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 10commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 11whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 12rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 13construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 14time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 15a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 16permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 17operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 18will own or operate the facility.19    "Municipality with planning jurisdiction" means a 20municipality that has planning jurisdiction over all or a 21portion of the Brisbin Road commercial or industrial site 22under an applicable boundary agreement or otherwise. 23    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 24not a participating property.25    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 26located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and   SB2690- 3 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 2develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 3solar energy facility is filed with the county.4    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 5following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 6that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 7wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 8is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 9facility, public library, or community center.10    "Participating property" means real property that is the 11subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 12the owner of the real property that provides the facility 13owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 14property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 15energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 16supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 17real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 18of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 19commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.20    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 21located on participating property and that is existing and 22occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 23develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 24solar energy facility is filed with the county.25    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 26        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right   SB2690- 4 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 2    or 3        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 4    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 5    Natural Areas Preservation Act. 6    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 7substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 8containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 9storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility 10or commercial solar energy facility.11    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 12blades. 13    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 14the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 15zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 16for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 17facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 18requirements specified in this Section but may not include 19requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 20commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 21than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 22siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 23that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 24in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 25outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 26outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning   SB2690- 5 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1jurisdiction of a municipality. 2    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 3subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 4special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 5commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 6approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 7county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 8of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 9hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance 10with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60 11days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 12county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 13an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 14witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 15restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 16limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 17cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 18public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 19Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 20permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 21conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 22be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 23county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 24impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 25prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 26wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit   SB2690- 6 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 2of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 3mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 4to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 5Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 6systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 7board.8    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 9with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 10compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 112023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).12    (e) A county may require: 13        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 14    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 15    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  16Setback Description           Setback Distance 17Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip18Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the19                              nearest point on the outside20                              wall of the structure 21Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip22                              height of the wind tower to the23                              nearest point on the outside  SB2690- 7 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1                              wall of the structure 2Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip3                              height of the wind tower to the4                              nearest point on the outside5                              wall of the structure 6Boundary Lines of             None7Participating Property  8Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip9Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the10                              nearest point on the property11                              line of the nonparticipating12                              property 13Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip14                              height of the wind tower15                              to the center point of the16                              public road right-of-way 17Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip18Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the19and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property20(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 21Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way   SB2690- 8 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line2Outbuildings) 3Overhead Utility Service      None4Lines to Individual5Houses or Outbuildings 6Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade7and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower8Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the9Protected Lands               property line of the fish and10                              wildlife area or protected11                              land12    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 13    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 14    National Electrical Code, the The National Electrical 15    Safety Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the 16    Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and their designees 17    or successors; . 18        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 19    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 20    indicates that any occupied community building or 21    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 22    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 23    operating conditions;24        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as   SB2690- 9 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 2    edge of any component of the facility:  3Setback Description           Setback Distance 4Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest5Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 6Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 7Boundary Lines of             None8Participating Property     9Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest10                              edge 11Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest12Nonparticipating Property     point on the property13                              line of the nonparticipating14                              property 15        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 16    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 17    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 18    feet; and 19        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 20    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more   SB2690- 10 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 2    arrays are at full tilt. 3    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 4waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 5affected nonparticipating property.6    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 7in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 8commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 9than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 10Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 11901, and 910.12    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 13installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 14commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 15that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 16siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 17development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 18solar energy facilities. 19    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 20commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 21facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 22permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 23the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 24ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 25conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 26regulations.   SB2690- 11 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 2disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 3facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 4developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 5agricultural or industrial uses. 6    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a 7commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 8facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 9by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the 10county with similar capital value and cost. 11    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county 12shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 13or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 14commercial solar energy facility or related financial 15assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 16the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 17agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 18standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 19version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 202022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 21accordance with the financial assurance required by those 22agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 23    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 24solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 25the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how 26surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored   SB2690- 12 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1during and following construction or deconstruction of the 2facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 3facility developer and shall include the location of any 4potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 5extent this information is publicly available from the county 6or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 7drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 8procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 9agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 10owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 11procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 12affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 13and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 14practicable. 15    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 16wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 17property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 18to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 19    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 20surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 21solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 22similar structures. 23    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 24towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 25blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 26height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air   SB2690- 13 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 2Part 77.3    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 4facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 5provide:6        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 7    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 8    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 9    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and10        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife 11    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting 12    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 13    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 14    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 15    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 16    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 17    review. 18    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 19or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 20recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 21Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 22Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 23    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:24        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 25    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 26    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or  SB2690- 14 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 2    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 3    protected lands, including areas identified by the 4    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.5    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 6evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 7Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 8State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 9Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 10    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 11limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 12at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 13health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 14songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 15commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 16and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 17cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 18Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 19management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 20impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 21and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 22if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 23comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 24the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 25constructed. 26    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the   SB2690- 15 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 2Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 3vegetation management plans that may be required under this 4subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 5guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 6property management practices that provide and maintain native 7and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 8the health and well-being of pollinators. 9    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 10with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 11district, or other unit of local government relating to a 12commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 13facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 14owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 15improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 16commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 17facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 18by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 19wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 20so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 21driving public after the completion of the facility's 22construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 23the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 24commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 25restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 26the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as   SB2690- 16 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1a result of construction-related activities.2    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 3owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 4specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 5the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 6energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 7charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 8a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 9use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably 10related to the cost of administration of the road use 11agreement. 12    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 13for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 14damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 15the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 16energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 17commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 18the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 19caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 20facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 21with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 22for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 23owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 24or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 25caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 26wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility   SB2690- 17 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1as soon as reasonably practicable. 2    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 3owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 4commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 5facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 6including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 7ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 8the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 9Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the 10drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 11plan required by subsection (j-5). 12    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 13102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 14approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 15energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 16application was submitted to a unit of local government before 17January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 18(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 19energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 20agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 21Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 22Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 23commercial solar energy development on property that is 24located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 25Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 26appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023,   SB2690- 18 -LRB104 15180 WRO 28324 b1and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 2Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 3    (v) Grundy County or a municipality with planning 4jurisdiction may prohibit the siting or establish standards 5for the development and operation of a commercial wind energy 6facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or both, on any 7portion of the Brisbin Road commercial or industrial site 8under its planning jurisdiction.9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the 10standards adopted by Grundy County or a municipality with 11planning jurisdiction under this subsection (v) must comply 12only with the provisions of this Section that were in effect on 13the day immediately before the effective date of Public Act 14102-1123. However, Grundy County or such a municipality may 15exercise any powers otherwise granted to it under this 16Section, including the authority to direct facilities and 17facility owners to comply with subsection (j-5), subsection 18(s-5), or any other applicable provision of this Section. 19(Source: P.A. 102-1123, eff. 1-27-23; 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 20103-580, eff. 12-8-23; revised 7-29-24.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.